Arkansas, session 2025, HB1560.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 22-9-203, concerning the award procedure
for contracts for public improvements, is amended to add an additional
subsection to read as follows:
(n)(1) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the state, an
agency of the state, a county, a municipality, a school district, or other
local taxing unit shall not enter into a contract with a contractor that
includes a project designed by an electrical engineering firm unless the
design requires allowance for a three-bid specification by three (3) separate
lighting agencies.
(2) As used in this subsection, "lighting agency" means an
entity that represents one (1) or more lighting manufacturers for sale
through electrical distribution houses.
(3) This subsection does not apply to a municipal electric
utility.
*JLL087*
02/21/2025 11:34:17 AM JLL087

HB1560
(4) An architect or an electrical engineer may make an allowance
for a specialty fixture to be procured outside of the three-bid requirement
under subdivision (n)(1) of this section when circumstances warrant the
allowance because of design aesthetics or historical purposes, or both.
































02/21/2025 11:34:17 AM JLL087